Washington statutes.
RCW 16.36.050

Unlawful actions—Importation—Required certificates—Intentional or willful misconduct.

(1) It is unlawful for a person to bring an animal into Washington state without first securing a certificate of veterinary inspection, reviewed by the state veterinarian of the state of origin, verifying that the animal meets the Washington state animal health requirements. This subsection does not apply to:

(a) Those animals that qualify for an exemption in RCW 16.36.140; or

(b) Other animals exempted by the director by rule.

(2) For animals imported into Washington it is unlawful for a person to transport or deliver an animal to any physical address other than the physical address of the destination designated by a certificate of veterinary inspection, import health papers, permits, or other transportation documents required by law or rule. The director may exempt animals from this requirement by rule.

(3) It is unlawful for a person to intentionally falsely make, complete, alter, use, or sign a certificate of veterinary inspection or official animal health document of the department.

(4) It is unlawful for a person to intentionally falsely apply, alter, or remove an official animal health or official animal identification tag, permanent mark, or other device.

(5) It is unlawful for a person to willfully hinder, obstruct, or resist the director, or any peace officer or deputized state veterinarian acting under him or her, when engaged in the performance of their duties.

(6) It is unlawful for a person to willfully fail to comply with or to violate any rule or order adopted by the director under this chapter.

[ 2011 c 204 s 9; 2010 c 66 s 2; 2007 c 71 s 2; 1998 c 8 s 5; 1979 c 154 s 11; 1947 c 172 s 4; 1927 c 165 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 3114. Prior: 1915 c 100 s 7; 1905 c 169 s 1; 1903 c 125 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 c 154: See note following RCW 15.49.330.